Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-204
Bingo, defined.

(1) Bingo means that form of gambling in which:

(a) The winning numbers or song titles, musical artists, or music genres are determined by random selection from a pool of seventy-five or ninety numbered designators or song titles, musical artists, or music genres; and

(b) A player marks by physically daubing or covering or, automatically or manually with the aid of a bingo card monitoring device, enters or otherwise conceals those randomly selected numbers or song titles, musical artists, or music genres which match on a bingo card that the player has purchased or leased only at the time and place of the bingo occasion.

(2) Bingo does not include:

(a) Any scheme which uses any mechanical gaming device, computer gaming device, electronic gaming device, or video gaming device which has the capability of awarding something of value, free games redeemable for something of value, or tickets or stubs redeemable for something of value;

(b) Any activity which is authorized or regulated under the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, the State Lottery Act, section 9-701, or Chapter 2, article 12; or

(c) Any activity which is prohibited under Chapter 28, article 11.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 4;

Laws 1982, LB 602A, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 9-127;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 44;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 429, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB775, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 11.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.

Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-401.

Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, see section 9-301.

Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-501.

State Lottery Act, see section 9-801.